Massachusetts, session 194th, H2620.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 19 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. Section 25 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
striking the definitions for “Petition” and “Petitioner.”
SECTION 3. Section 26 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
striking the definition for “Respondent.”
SECTION 4. Chapter 140 of the Massachusetts General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking section 131R in its entirety.
SECTION 5. Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by repealing sections
76, 77, 77A, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, and 85.
of 2

SECTION 6. Chapter 140 of the Massachusetts General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking sections 131S, 131T, 131U, 131V, 131W, 131X,
and 131Y.
of 2